District of Columbia statutes.
22-3004

Third degree sexual abuse.

A person shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years and may be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, if that person engages in or causes sexual contact with or by another person in the following manner:

(1)

By using force against that other person;

(2)

By threatening or placing that other person in reasonable fear that any person will be subjected to death, bodily injury, or kidnapping;

(3)

After rendering that person unconscious; or

(4)

After administering to that person by force or threat of force, or without the knowledge or permission of that other person, a drug, intoxicant, or similar substance that substantially impairs the ability of that other person to appraise or control his or her conduct.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 203, 42 DCR 53
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 13(c), 44 DCR 1408
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(c), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 23-113 and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-4104.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $100,000” in the introductory paragraph.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(c) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.